Utah statutes.
58-46a-305.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following persons may engage in acts and practices included within the definition of practice as a hearing instrument specialist or hearing instrument intern, subject to their professional licensure authorization and restrictions, without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  an audiologist licensed under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 41, Speech-language Pathology and Audiology Licensing Act; and

(2)  a physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or osteopathic physician licensed under the provisions of Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2004 General Session

